src/morphological-analyzer/fst/sif.twolc
Alphabet
A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S Š T U V W X Y Z Ž Ä É Ö Ü
a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s š t u v w x y z ž ä é ö ü '

%{A%}:a 

%{A1%}:o

;
  
Sets

Vow = a e i o u ä é ö ü y ;

Cnst = b c d f g h j k l m n p q r s š t v w x y z ž ' ;

FrontVowels = ä ö ü ;  
			 
BackVowels = a o u ;

NeutralVow = e i é y ;

Rules

"Vowels harmony"
%{A%}:ä <=> FrontVowels [ Cnst | NeutralVow ]* _ ;

"Mutation of final volwel to o in context of back vowels and to ö in context of front vowels"
%{A1%}:ö <=> FrontVowels [ Cnst | NeutralVow ]* _ ;
